Utah statutes.
9-8-802.   Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1)  "Agency" means any administrative unit of Utah's state government or
local government.
(2)  "Collecting institutions" means historical societies, museums, archives,
and libraries that:
(a)  are operated by nonprofit corporations in Utah or by any Utah agency; and
(b)  preserve our heritage and benefit society by acquiring and preserving
reposited materials.
(3)  "Reposited materials" means materials of historical, artistic, literary,
or scientific value that are deposited in a collecting institution.
